Washington statutes.
RCW 27.53.060

Disturbing archaeological resource or site—Permit required—Conditions—Exceptions—Penalty.

(1) On the private and public lands of this state it shall be unlawful for any person, firm, corporation, or any agency or institution of the state or a political subdivision thereof to knowingly remove, alter, dig into, or excavate by use of any mechanical, hydraulic, or other means, or to damage, deface, or destroy any historic or prehistoric archaeological resource or site, or remove any archaeological object from such site, except for Indian graves or cairns, or any glyptic or painted record of any tribe or peoples, or historic graves as defined in chapter 68.05 RCW, disturbances of which shall be a class C felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW, without having obtained a written permit from the director for such activities.

(2) The director must obtain the consent of the private or public property owner or agency responsible for the management thereof, prior to issuance of the permit. The property owner or agency responsible for the management of such land may condition its consent on the execution of a separate agreement, lease, or other real property conveyance with the applicant as may be necessary to carry out the legal rights or duties of the public property landowner or agency.

(3) The director, in consultation with the affected tribes, shall develop guidelines for the issuance and processing of permits.

(4) Such written permit and any agreement or lease or other conveyance required by any public property owner or agency responsible for management of such land shall be physically present while any such activity is being conducted.

(5) The provisions of this section shall not apply to the removal of artifacts found exposed on the surface of the ground which are not historic archaeological resources or sites.

(6) When determining whether to grant or condition a permit, the director may give great weight to the final record of previous civil or criminal penalties against either the applicant, the parties responsible for conducting the work, or the parties responsible for carrying out the terms and conditions of the permit, either under this chapter or under comparable federal laws. If the director denies a permit, the applicant may request a hearing as provided for in chapter 34.05 RCW.

[ 2002 c 211 s 3; 1989 c 44 s 7; 1988 c 124 s 4; 1986 c 266 s 18; 1977 ex.s. c 195 s 14; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 82 s 2; 1975 1st ex.s. c 134 s 6.]

NOTES:

Purpose—2002 c 211: See note following RCW 27.53.020.

Intent—1989 c 44: See RCW 27.44.030.

Liberal construction—1989 c 44: See RCW 27.44.901.

Intent—Application—1988 c 124: See notes following RCW 27.53.030.

Severability—1986 c 266: See note following RCW 38.52.005.

Severability—1977 ex.s. c 195: See note following RCW 27.53.020.